it: Forma del sacco a pelo: Matrimoniale; A mummia; Rettangolare; Semi-rettangolare; Con base quadrata; Altra
da: Soveposeform: Dobbeltbredde; Mumie; Rektangulær; Halvrektangulær; Firkantet fodende; Andet
el: Σχήμα υπνόσακου: Διπλό; Τύπου μούμιας; Ορθογώνιο; Ημιορθογώνιο; Με τετράγωνα πόδια; Άλλο
nb: Soveposeform: Dobbel bredde; Mummie; Rektangulær; Halvrektangulær; Firkantet fotboks; Annet
pt-BR: Saco de dormir formato: Casal; Sarcófago; Retangular; Semirretangular; Pé quadrado; Outro
ro-RO: Formă a sacului de dormit: Dublu; Mumie; Dreptunghiulară; Semidreptunghiulară; Picioare în formă pătrată; Alta
th: Shapesของถุงนอน: กว้างพิเศษ (นอนคู่); ทรงมัมมี่; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกึ่งสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ปลายเท้าทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
fi: Makuupussin muoto: Tuplaleveä; Muumio; Suorakulmainen; Puolisuorakulmainen; Suorakulmainen jalkatila; Muu
lt-LT: Miegmaišio forma: Dvigubo pločio; Kokono formos; Stačiakampis; Pusiau stačiakampis; Kvadratinės apačios; Kita
sv: Sovsäck – form: Dubbelbred; Mumiemodell; Rektangulär; Halvrektangulär; Fyrkantig fotbox; Övrigt
hr-HR: Shapesvreće za spavanje: Dvostruka širina; Mumija; Pravokutna; Polupravokutna; S četvrtastim dnom; Ostalo
ko: 침낭 모양: 더블 와이드; 머미형; 사각형; 반사각형; 사각 발형; 기타
cs: Tvar spacího pytle: Pro dva; Mumie; Obdélníkový; Poloobdélníkový; Se čtvercovým prostorem pro nohy; Jiný
sl-SI: Oblika spalne vreče: Dvojna širina; Mumija; Pravokotna; Polpravokotna; S kvadratnim dnom; Drugo
zh-TW: 睡袋形狀: 雙人加寬; 木乃伊形; 長方形; 半長方形; 方形腳部; 其他
pt-PT: Forma do saco-cama: Duplo; Múmia; Retangular; Semirretangular; Fundo quadrado; Outro
hu: Hálózsák formája: Dupla szélességű; Múmia; Négyszögletes; Félig négyszögletes; Szögletes lábrészű; Egyéb
fr: Forme du sac de couchage: Double largeur; Momie; Rectangulaire; Semi-rectangulaire; Pieds carrés; Autre
ja: 寝袋形状: ダブルワイド; マミー; レクタンギュラー; セミレクタンギュラー; スクエアフット; その他
pl: Kształt śpiwora: Podwójny; Mumia; Prostokątny; Półprostokątny; Z kwadratowym miejscem na stopy; Inne
tr: Uyku tulumu şekli: Çift genişlik; Mumya; Dikdörtgen; Yarı dikdörtgen; Kare ayak kısmı; Diğer
nl: Slaapzak vorm: Dubbelbreed; Mummie; Rechthoekig; Semi-rechthoekig; Vierkant voeteneinde; Overig
ru: Форма спального мешка: Двухместный; Кокон; Прямоугольный (одеяло); Полупрямоугольный; С квадратным дном; Другое
es: Formas de sacos de dormir: Doble ancho; Momia; Rectangular; Semirectangular; Pie cuadrado; Otro
sk-SK: Tvar spacieho vaku: Dvojitá šírka; Múmia; Obdĺžnik; Poloobdĺžnik; So štvorcovým priestorom na nohy; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на спалния чувал: Двоен; Мумия; Правоъгълна; Полуправоъгълна; С квадратна част за краката; Друга
en: Sleeping bag shape: Double-wide; Mummy; Rectangular; Semi-rectangular; Square-foot; Other
zh-CN: 睡袋款式: 加宽双人; 木乃伊形; 长方形; 半长方形; 方脚形; 其他
de: Form des Schlafsacks: Doppelbreit; Mumienform; Rechteckig; Halbrechteckig; Quadratischer Fußbereich; Andere
vi: Hình dạng túi ngủ: Rộng đôi; Hình xác ướp; Hình chữ nhật; Bán chữ nhật; Đáy vuông; Khác